Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 3. State Grand Jury

§ 7-5-301.
Petition for impaneling; determination by district judge.

If the attorney general or the governor deems it to be in the public interest to convene a grand jury which shall have jurisdiction extending beyond the boundaries of any single county, he may petition the judge of any district court for an order in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

7-5-301

through

7-5-309

. The district judge may, for good cause shown, order the impaneling of a state grand jury which shall have statewide jurisdiction. In making his determination as to the need for impaneling a state grand jury, the judge shall require a showing that the matter cannot be effectively handled by a county grand jury impaneled pursuant to W.S.

7-5-101

through

7-5-209

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-117.1; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Stated

in

Nimmo v. State, 603 P.2d 386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 7-5-302.
Powers and duties; applicable law; procedural rules.

A state grand jury shall have the same powers and duties and shall function in the same manner as a county grand jury, except for the provisions of W.S. 7-5-202(b)(ii), and except that its jurisdiction shall extend throughout the state. The law applicable to county grand juries shall apply to state grand juries except when the law is inconsistent with the provisions of W.S.

7-5-301

through

7-5-309

. The supreme court may promulgate any rules it deems necessary to govern the procedures of state grand juries.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-117.2; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-5-303.
Selection and term of members.

The district judge granting the petition to convene a state grand jury shall impanel the state grand jury from a base jury list for the state compiled by the supreme court. The district court judge may specify that the base jury list for the state not include the names of jurors from every county within the state to limit juror expense and inconvenience of travel. A state grand jury shall be composed of twelve (12) persons, but not more than one-half (1/2) of the members of the state grand jury shall be residents of any one (1) county. The members of the state grand jury shall be selected by the court in the same manner as jurors of county grand juries and shall serve for one (1) year following selection unless discharged sooner by the district judge.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-117.3; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

deleted the former first two sentences; substituted “petition to convene a state grand jury” for “order,” “a base jury list for the state” for “the lists,” and “supreme court” for “clerks of court” in the present first sentence; and
substituted “district court judge may specify that the base jury list for the state” for “judge preparing the final list from which the grand jurors will be chosen need” and to limit juror” for “having due regard for the” in the present second sentence.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of indictment as affected by substitution or addition of grand jurors after commencement of investigation, 2 ALR4th 980.

§ 7-5-304.
Summoning of jurors.

Jurors shall be summoned and selected in the same manner as jurors of county grand juries.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-117.4; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to summoning of county grand juries, see §

7-5-102

.

§ 7-5-305.
Judicial supervision.

Judicial supervision of the state grand jury shall be maintained by the district judge who issued the order impaneling the grand jury, and all indictments, reports and other formal returns of any kind made by the grand jury shall be returned to that judge.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-117.5; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-5-306.
Presentation of evidence.

The presentation of the evidence shall be made to the state grand jury by the attorney general or his designee. In the event the office of the attorney general is under investigation, the presentation of evidence shall be made to the state grand jury by an attorney appointed by the Wyoming supreme court.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-117.6; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duty of prosecutor to present exculpatory evidence to state grand jury, 49 ALR5th 639.

§ 7-5-307.
Return of indictment; designation of venue; consolidation of indictments.

Any indictment by the state grand jury shall be returned to the district judge without any designation of venue. Thereupon, the judge shall, by order, designate the county of venue for the purpose of trial. The judge may order the consolidation of an indictment returned by a county grand jury with an indictment returned by a state grand jury and fix venue for trial.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-117.7; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to venue in criminal cases generally, see §

1-7-102

.

§ 7-5-308.
Investigative powers; secrecy of proceedings.

In addition to its powers of indictment, a statewide grand jury impaneled under W.S.

7-5-301

through

7-5-309

may, at the request of the attorney general, cause an investigation to be made into the extent of organized criminal activity within the state and return a report to the attorney general.

Disclosure of matters occurring before the grand jury, other than its deliberations and the vote of any juror, may be made to the attorney general and to any district attorney for use in the performance of their duties. Those officials may disclose so much of the grand jury’s proceedings to law enforcement agencies as they deem essential to the public interest and effective law enforcement.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a juror, attorney, interpreter, stenographer, operator of a recording device or any typist who transcribes recorded testimony may disclose matters occurring before the grand jury only when so directed by the court preliminarily to or in connection with a judicial proceeding or when permitted by the court at the request of the defendant upon a showing that a particularized need exists for a motion to dismiss the indictment because of matters occurring before the grand jury.

No obligation of secrecy may be imposed upon any person except in accordance with this section. The court may direct that an indictment shall be kept secret until the defendant is in custody or has given bail, and in that event, the clerk shall seal the indictment and no person shall disclose the finding of the indictment except when necessary for the issuance and execution of a warrant or summons.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-117.8; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Discovery, in civil proceeding, of records of criminal investigation by state grand jury, 69 ALR4th 298.

What is “judicial proceeding” within Rule 6(e)(3)(C)(i) of the Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure permitting disclosure of matters occurring before grand jury when so directed by court preliminarily to or in connection with such proceeding, 52 ALR Fed 411.

Relief, remedy or sanction for violation of Rule 6(e) of Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure, prohibiting disclosure of matters occurring before grand jury, 73 ALR Fed 112.

§ 7-5-309.
Costs and expenses.

The costs and expenses incurred in impaneling a state grand jury and in the performance of its functions and duties shall be paid by the state out of funds appropriated to the attorney general for that purpose.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-117.9; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.